Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Chapter 03. Public Schools Generally.

Administrative Code. —

For statewide goals, see 4 AAC 04.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, § 1 et seq.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, § 1 et seq.

Residence for purpose of admission to public school. 83 ALR2d 497, 56 ALR3d 641.

Modern status of doctrine of sovereign immunity as applied to public schools and institutions of higher learning. 33 ALR3d 703.

Noncustodial parent’s rights as respects education of child. 36 ALR3d 1093.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for educational malpractice. 1 ALR4th 1139.